Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1. (1) The Department of Justice shall establish a program for awarding  grants
to law enforcement agencies and local  governments to fund training for groups and agencies
that interact with persons who have experienced trauma.
(2) A  law enforcement agency or local government may apply for a grant under this
section to fund training  for law enforcement agencies, district attorneys, sexual assault
nurse examiners, emergency communications workers, victim advocates  or any other group
or agency the law enforcement agency or local government determines appropriate for  the
training. The application may request funding  for an established training program provided
by an outside entity, or for the development of a  training program within the group or
agency or in cooperation with other groups or agencies.
(3) The department shall by rule establish the application process and eligibility criteria
for the grant program. At a minimum, the  training program for which a law enforcement
agency or local government requests funding must be consistent  with the model training
program described in subsection (5) of this section.
(4) The department shall by rule establish the process of awarding  grants under this
section. No later than July 1, 2023,  the department shall award grants in accordance with the
rules of the program.  When awarding grants under this section, the department shall con-
sider the  community partnerships of the group or agency for which the law enforcement
agency or local government seeks funding.
(5) No later than  July 1, 2022, the department shall develop a model training program for
groups and  agencies that interact with persons who have experienced trauma. The model
training program must, at a minimum:
(a) Be  research-based and take into account the psychological and neurological effects
of trauma;
(b) Utilize best practices when recommending  techniques for interacting with persons
who have experienced trauma;
(c) Have the objective of minimizing further trauma; and
(d) Take into account the impact of structural racism and other forms of  historical
trauma.
Enrolled House Bill 2575 (HB 2575-B) Page 1
(6) The department shall by rule establish outcome measures to be used for evaluating
grant program performance.
(7) In adopting rules under subsections (3) and (4) of this section, and in developing the
model training program described in  subsection (5) of this section, the department shall
consult with subject matter experts  from community-based organizations, including organ-
izations that represent individuals who are Black, Indigenous and People of Color (BIPOC).
SECTION 1a. Sections 2 and 3 of this  2021 Act are added to and made a part of ORS
181A.355 to 181A.670.
SECTION 2. (1) No later than  January 1, 2023, the Department of Public Safety Standards
and Training, in consultation with the Department  of Justice, shall develop best practices for
law enforcement agencies when interacting with persons who have experienced trauma.
(2)(a) The  best practices developed under this section must offer alternative options for
law enforcement agencies of varying size and resource capacity.
(b) The best practices developed under this section must, at a minimum:
(A) Be research-based and take into account  the psychological and neurological effects
of trauma;
(B) Recommend techniques for interacting with persons who have experienced trauma;
(C) Have the objective of minimizing further trauma;
(D) Take into account the impact  of structural racism and other forms of historical
trauma;
(E) Require law enforcement officers to consider the effects of trauma when  working on
a case;
(F) Recommend techniques for interviewing persons who have experienced trauma; and
(G) Provide recommendations for writing reports based on interviews  with persons who
have experienced trauma.
(3) Law enforcement agencies  within this state shall adopt appropriate best practice
policies for interacting with persons who have experienced trauma  no later than the date
established by the Department of Public Safety Standards and Training by rule.
(4) The Department of Public Safety Standards  and Training shall adopt rules to carry
out the provisions of this section.
SECTION 3.
Beginning January 1, 2023, the Department of Public Safety Standards and
Training shall regularly review and, if necessary, update  training on interacting with persons
who have experienced trauma,  consistent with the model training program developed by the
Department of Justice under section 1  of this 2021 Act, for all police officers who enter the
training academy operated by the Department of Public Safety Standards and Training.
SECTION 4.  Section 1 of this 2021 Act is amended to read:
Sec. 1.  [ (1) The Department of Justice shall establish a program for awarding grants to  law
enforcement agencies and local governments to fund training for groups  and agencies that interact with
persons who have experienced trauma. ]
[(2) A law enforcement agency or local government may apply for a grant under this section to fund
training for law enforcement agencies, district attorneys, sexual assault  nurse examiners, emergency
communications workers, victim advocates or any other group or agency the law enforcement agency
or local government determines appropriate for the training. The application may request  funding for
an established training program provided by an outside entity, or for the  development of a training
program within the group or agency or in cooperation with other groups or agencies. ]
[(3) The department shall  by rule establish the application process and eligibility criteria for the
grant program.  At a minimum, the training program for which a law enforcement agency or local
government requests funding must  be consistent with the model training program described in sub-
section (5) of this section. ]
[(4) The department shall by rule establish the process of awarding  grants under this section. No
later than July 1, 2023,  the department shall award grants in accordance with the rules of the program.
Enrolled House Bill 2575 (HB 2575-B) Page 2
When awarding  grants under this section, the department shall consider the community partnerships
of the group or agency for which the law enforcement agency or local government seeks funding. ]
[(5) No later than July 1, 2022, ] The  Department  of Justice  shall develop a model training pro-
gram for groups and  agencies that interact with persons who have experienced trauma. The model
training program must, at a minimum:
[(a)] (1)  Be research-based and take into account  the psychological and neurological effects of
trauma;
[(b)] (2) Utilize best practices when recommending techniques for  interacting with persons who
have experienced trauma;
[(c)] (3) Have the objective of minimizing further trauma; and
[(d)] (4) Take  into account the impact of structural racism and other forms of historical trauma.
[(6) The department shall  by rule establish outcome measures to be used for evaluating grant pro-
gram performance. ]
[(7) In adopting rules under subsections (3) and (4) of this section, and  in developing the model
training program described in subsection (5) of this section, the department shall consult  with subject
matter experts from community-based organizations, including organizations  that represent individuals
who are Black, Indigenous and People of Color (BIPOC). ]
SECTION 5.  Section 2 of this 2021 Act is amended to read:
Sec. 2.  (1) [ No later than January 1, 2023, ] The Department  of Public Safety Standards and
Training, in consultation with the Department of Justice, shall develop best practices  for law
enforcement agencies when interacting with persons who have experienced trauma.
(2)(a) The best practices developed under this section must offer  alternative options for law
enforcement agencies of varying size and resource capacity.
(b) The best practices developed under this section must, at a minimum:
(A) Be research-based  and take into account the psychological and neurological effects of
trauma;
(B) Recommend techniques for interacting with persons who have experienced trauma;
(C) Have the objective of minimizing further trauma;
(D) Take into account the impact of structural racism and other forms of historical trauma;
(E) Require law enforcement officers to consider the effects of trauma  when working on a case;
(F) Recommend techniques for interviewing persons who have experienced trauma; and
(G) Provide recommendations for writing reports based on interviews with persons  who have
experienced trauma.
(3) Law  enforcement agencies within this state shall adopt appropriate best practice policies for
interacting with persons who have experienced trauma no later than the date established by the
Department of Public Safety Standards and Training by rule.
(4) The Department of  Public Safety Standards and Training shall adopt rules to carry out the
provisions of this section.
SECTION 6.
 Section 3 of this 2021 Act is amended to read:
Sec. 3.  [ Beginning January 1, 2023, ] The Department of Public Safety Standards and  Training
shall regularly review and, if necessary, update training on interacting with  persons who have ex-
perienced trauma, consistent  with the model training program developed by the Department of Jus-
tice under section 1 of this 2021 Act, for all police officers who  enter the training academy operated
by the Department of Public Safety Standards and Training.
SECTION 7. (1) The amendments to section 1 of this 2021 Act by section 4 of this 2021
Act become operative January 1, 2024.
(2) The amendments to sections 2 and 3 of this  2021 Act by sections 5 and 6 of this 2021
Act become operative January 1, 2023.
SECTION 8. In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there is appropri-
ated to the Department of Justice, Crime  Victims and Survivor Services Division, for the
biennium beginning July 1, 2021, out of the General Fund, the amount of $960,000, for  the
purpose of implementing sections 1 and 2 of this 2021 Act.
Enrolled House Bill 2575 (HB 2575-B) Page 3
SECTION 9. This 2021 Act takes effect on the 91st day after the date  on which the 2021
regular session of the Eighty-first Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
Passed by House June 24, 2021
..................................................................................
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Speaker of House
Passed by Senate June 26, 2021
..................................................................................
Peter Courtney, President of Senate
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2021
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2021
..................................................................................
Kate Brown, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2021
..................................................................................
Shemia Fagan, Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 2575 (HB 2575-B) Page 4